Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-159
Fees authorized.

A licensed interpreter appointed pursuant to sections 20-150 to 20-159 is entitled to a fee for professional services and other relevant expenses as agreed between the licensed interpreter and the contracting entity. When the licensed interpreter is appointed by a court, the fee shall be paid out of the General Fund with funds appropriated to the Supreme Court for that purpose or from funds, including grant money, made available to the Supreme Court for such purpose. When the licensed interpreter is appointed by an appointing authority other than a court, the fee shall be paid out of funds available to the governing body of the appointing authority.

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 54, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB287, § 5.